California statutes. Business and Professions Code
-------------------------------------------

5408.7.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that this section shall not serve as a precedent for other changes to the law regarding outdoor advertising displays on, or adjacent to, highways. The Legislature recognizes that the streets in the City and County of San Francisco that are designated as state or federal highways are unique in that they are also streets with street lights, sidewalks, and many of the other features of busy urban streets. At the same time, these streets double as a way, and
 often the only way, for people to move through the city and county from one boundary to another. The Legislature recognizes the particular topography of the City and County of San Francisco, the popularity of the area as a tourist destination, the high level of foot traffic, and the unique design of its highways.

(b) For purposes of this section, “street furniture” is any kiosk, trash receptacle, bench, public toilet, news rack, or public telephone placed on, or adjacent to, a street designated as a state or federal highway.

(c) In addition to the advertising displays permitted by Sections 5405, 5408, and 5408.5, advertising displays located on street furniture may be placed on, or adjacent to, any street designated as a state or federal highway within the jurisdiction of a city and county, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) The advertising display meets the traffic safety standards of the city and county. These standards may include provisions requiring a finding and certification by an appropriate official of the city and county that the proposed advertising display does not constitute a hazard to traffic.

(2) Any advertising display that is within 660 feet of, and visible from, any street designated as a state or federal highway shall be consistent with federal law and regulations.

(3) Advertising displays on street furniture shall be placed in accordance with a permit or agreement with the city and county.

(4) Advertising displays on street furniture shall not extend beyond the exterior limits of the street furniture.

(d) Advertising displays placed on street furniture pursuant to a permit or agreement with the city and county shall not be subject to the state permit requirements of Article 6 (commencing with Section 5350). This subdivision does not affect the authority of the state to enforce compliance with federal law and regulations, as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) (1) The city and county shall, upon written notice of any suit or claim of liability against the state for any injury arising out of the placement of an advertising display approved by the city and county pursuant to subdivision (c), defend the state against the claim and provide indemnity to the state against any liability on the suit or claim.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, “indemnity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 2772 of the Civil Code.

(f) (1) This section shall become inoperative not later than 60 days from the date the director receives notice from the United States Secretary of Transportation that future operation of this section will result in a reduction of the state’s share of federal highway funds pursuant to Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(2) Upon receipt of the notice described in paragraph (1), the director shall notify in writing the Secretary of State and the City and County of San Francisco of that receipt.

(3) This section shall be repealed on January 1 immediately following the date the Secretary of State receives the notice required under paragraph (2).

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 320, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in subd. (f).   Repealed as of date prescribed in subd. (f).)
-------------------------------------------

5410.

Any advertising display located within 660 feet of the edge of the right-of-way of, and the copy of which is visible from, any penalty segment, or any bonus segment described in Section 5406 which display was lawfully maintained in existence on the effective date of this section but which was not on that date in conformity with the provisions of this article, may be maintained, and shall not be required to be removed until July 1, 1970. Any other sign which is lawful when erected, but which does not on January 1, 1968, or any time thereafter, conform to the provisions of this article, may be maintained, and shall not be required to be removed, until the end of the fifth year
 after it becomes nonconforming; provided that this section shall not apply to advertising displays adjacent to a landscaped freeway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no advertising display which was lawfully erected anywhere within this state shall be compelled to be removed, nor shall its customary maintenance or use be limited, whether or not the removal or limitation is pursuant to or because of this chapter or any other law, ordinance, or regulation of any governmental entity, without payment of compensation, as defined in the Eminent Domain Law (Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure), except as provided in Sections 5412.1, 5412.2, and 5412.3. The compensation shall be paid to the owner or owners of the advertising
 display and the owner or owners of the land upon which the display is located.

This section applies to all displays which were lawfully erected in compliance with state laws and local ordinances in effect when the displays were erected if the displays were in existence on November 6, 1978, or lawfully erected after November 6, 1978, regardless of whether the displays have become nonconforming or have been provided an amortization period. This section does not apply to on-premise displays as specified in Section 5272 or to displays which are relocated by mutual agreement between the display owner and the local entity.

“Relocation,” as used in this section, includes removal of a display and construction of a new display to substitute for the display removed.

It is a policy of this state to encourage local entities and display owners to enter into relocation agreements which allow
 local entities to continue development in a planned manner without expenditure of public funds while allowing the continued maintenance of private investment and a medium of public communication. Cities, counties, cities and counties, and all other local entities are specifically empowered to enter into relocation agreements on whatever terms are agreeable to the display owner and the city, county, city and county, or other local entity, and to adopt ordinances or resolutions providing for relocation of displays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 554, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.1.

A city, county, or city and county, whose ordinances or regulations are otherwise in full compliance with Section 5412, is not in violation of that section if the entity elects to require the removal without compensation of any display which meets all the following requirements:

(a) The display is located within an area shown as residential on a local general plan as of either the date an ordinance or regulation is enacted or becomes applicable to the area which incorporates the provisions of this section.

(b) The display is
 located within an area zoned for residential use either on the date on which the removal requirement is adopted or becomes applicable to the area.

(c) The display is not located within 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway with its copy visible from the highway, nor is placed or maintained beyond 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway with the purpose of its message being read from the main traveled way.

(d) The display is not required to be removed because of an overlay zone, combining zone, or any other special zoning district whose primary purpose is the removal or control of signs.

(e) The display is allowed to remain in existence for the period of time set forth below after the enactment or amendment after January 1, 1983, of any
 ordinance or regulation necessary to bring the entity requiring removal into compliance with Section 5412, and after giving notice of the removal requirement:Fair Market Value on Date of NoticeMinimum Yearsof Removal RequirementAllowed Under $1,9992 $2,000 to $3,9993 $4,000 to $5,9994 $6,000 to $7,9995 $8,000 to $9,9996$10,000 and over7The amounts provided in this section shall be adjusted each January 1 after January 1, 1983, in accordance with the changes in building costs, as indicated in the United States Department of
 Commerce Composite Cost Index for Construction Costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 494, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.2.

A city or city and county, whose ordinances or regulations are otherwise in full compliance with Section 5412, is not in violation of that section if the entity elects to require the removal without compensation of any display which meets all the following requirements:

(a) The display is located within an incorporated area shown as agricultural on a local general plan as of either the date an ordinance or regulation is enacted or becomes applicable to the area which incorporates the provisions of this section.

(b) The display is
 located within an area zoned for agricultural use either on the date on which the removal requirement is adopted or becomes applicable to the area.

(c) The display is not located within 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway with its copy visible from the highway, nor is placed or maintained beyond 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway with the purpose of its message being read from the main traveled way.

(d) The display is not required to be removed because of an overlay zone, combining zone, or any other special zoning district whose primary purpose is the removal or control of signs.

(e) The display is allowed to remain in existence for the period of time set forth below after the enactment or amendment after January 1, 1983, of any
 ordinance or regulation necessary to bring the entity requiring removal into compliance with Section 5412, and after giving notice of the removal requirement:Fair Market Value on Date of NoticeMinimum Yearsof Removal RequirementAllowed Under $1,9992 $2,000 to $3,9993 $4,000 to $5,9994 $6,000 to $7,9995 $8,000 to $9,9996$10,000 and over7The amounts provided in this section shall be adjusted each January 1 after January 1, 1983, in accordance with the changes in building costs as indicated in the United States Department of
 Commerce Composite Cost Index for Construction Costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 494, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.3.

A county whose ordinances or regulations are otherwise in full compliance with Section 5412, is not in violation of that section if the county elects to require the removal without compensation of any display which meets all the following requirements:

(a) The display is located within an unincorporated area shown as agricultural on a local general plan as of either the date an ordinance or regulation is enacted or becomes applicable to the area which incorporates the provisions of this section.

(b) The display is located within
 an area zoned for agricultural use either on the date on which the removal requirement is adopted or becomes applicable to the area.

(c) The display is not located within 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway with its copy visible from the highway, nor is placed or maintained beyond 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway with the purpose of its message being read from the main traveled way.

(d) The display is not required to be removed because of an overlay zone, combining zone, or any other special zoning district whose primary purpose is the removal or control of signs.

(e) The display is allowed to remain in existence for the period of time set forth below after the adoption or amendment after January 1, 1983, of any ordinance or
 regulation necessary to bring the entity requiring removal into compliance with Section 5412, and after giving notice of the removal requirement:Fair Market Value on Date of NoticeMinimum Yearsof Removal RequirementAllowed Under $1,999 3.0 $2,000 to $3,999 4.5 $4,000 to $5,999 6.0 $6,000 to $7,999 7.5 $8,000 to $9,999 9.0$10,000 and over10.5The amounts provided in this section shall be adjusted each January 1 after January 1,
 1983, in accordance with the changes in building costs, as indicated in the United States Department of Commerce Composite Cost Index for Construction Costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 494, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.4.

Section 5412 shall not be applied in any judicial proceeding which was filed and served by any city, county, or city and county prior to January 1, 1982, except that Section 5412 shall be applied in litigation to prohibit the removal without compensation of any advertising display located within 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway with its copy visible from the highway, or any advertising display placed or maintained beyond 660 feet from the edge of the right-of-way of an interstate or primary highway that is placed with the purpose of its message being read from the main traveled way of the
 highway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 494, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5412.6.

The requirement by a governmental entity that a lawfully erected display be removed as a condition or prerequisite for the issuance or continued effectiveness of a permit, license, or other approval for any use, structure, development, or activity other than a display constitutes a compelled removal requiring compensation under Section 5412, unless the permit, license, or approval is requested for the construction of a building or structure which cannot be built without physically removing the display.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5413.

Prior to commencing judicial proceedings to compel the removal of an advertising display, the director may elect to negotiate with the person entitled to compensation in order to arrive at an agreement as to the amount of compensation to be paid. If the negotiations are unsuccessful, or if the director elects not to engage in negotiations, a civil proceeding may be instituted as set forth in Section 5414.

To facilitate the negotiations, the Department of Transportation shall prepare a valuation schedule for each of the various types of advertising displays based on all applicable data. The schedule shall be updated
 at least once every two years. The schedule shall be made available to any public entity requesting a copy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

5414.

Proceedings to compel the removal of displays and to determine the compensation required by this chapter shall be conducted pursuant to Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.010) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1278, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

5415.

The director shall prescribe and enforce regulations for the erection and maintenance of advertising displays permitted by Sections 5226, 5405, and 5408 consistent with Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code and the national standards promulgated thereunder by the Secretary of Transportation; provided, that the director shall not prescribe regulations imposing stricter requirements for the size, spacing or lighting of advertising displays than are prescribed by Section 5408 and provided that the director shall not prescribe regulations to conform to changes in federal law or regulations made after November 8, 1967, without prior legislative approval.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, no outdoor advertising shall be placed or maintained adjacent to any interstate highway or primary highway in violation of the national standards promulgated pursuant to subsections (c) and (f) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, as such standards existed on November 8, 1967.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5416.

The director shall seek, and may enter into, agreements with the Secretary of Transportation of the United States and shall take such steps as may be necessary from time to time to obtain, and may accept, any allotment of funds as provided by subdivision (j) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, as amended from time to time, and such steps as may be necessary from time to time to obtain funds allotted pursuant to Section 131 for the purpose of paying the 75 percent federal share of the compensation required by subdivision (g) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------

5417.

From state funds appropriated by the Legislature for such purposes and from federal funds made available for such purposes, the California Transportation Commission may allocate funds to the director for payment of compensation authorized by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1278, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

5418.

The California Transportation Commission is authorized to allocate sufficient funds from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund that are available for capital outlay purposes to match federal funds made available for the removal of outdoor advertising displays.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1106.)
-------------------------------------------

5418.1.

When allocating funds pursuant to Section 5418, the commission shall consider, and may designate for expenditure, all or any part of such funds in accordance with the following order of priorities for removal of those outdoor advertising displays for which compensation is provided pursuant to Section 5412:

(a) Hardship situations involving outdoor advertising displays located adjacent to highways which are included within the state scenic highway system, including those nonconforming outdoor advertising displays which are offered for immediate removal by the owners thereof.

(b) Hardship situations involving outdoor advertising displays located adjacent to other highways, including those nonconforming outdoor advertising displays which are offered for removal by the owners thereof.

(c) Nonconforming outdoor advertising displays located adjacent to highways which are included within the state scenic highway system.

(d) Nonconforming outdoor advertising displays which are generally used for product advertising, and which are located in unincorporated areas.

(e) Nonconforming outdoor advertising displays which are generally used for product advertising located within incorporated areas.

(f) Nonconforming outdoor advertising displays which are generally used for
 non-motorist-oriented directional advertising.

(g) Nonconforming outdoor advertising displays which are generally used for motorist-related directional advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1782.)
-------------------------------------------

5419.

(a) The director shall seek agreement with the Secretary of Transportation of the United States, or his successor, under provisions of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, to provide for effective control of outdoor advertising substantially as set forth herein, provided that such agreement can vary and change the definition of “unzoned commercial or industrial area” as set forth in Section 5222 and the definition of “business area” as set forth in Section 5223, or other sections related thereto, and provided further that if such agreement does vary from such sections it shall not be effective until the Legislature by statute amends the
 sections to conform with the terms of the agreement. If agreement is reached on these terms, the director shall execute the agreement on behalf of the state.

(b) In the event an agreement cannot be achieved under subdivision (a), the director shall promptly institute proceedings of the kind provided for in subdivision (l) of Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, in order to obtain a judicial determination as to whether this chapter and the regulations promulgated thereunder provide effective control of outdoor advertising as set forth therein. In such action the director shall request that the court declare rights, status, and other legal relations and declare whether the standards, criteria, and definitions contained in the agreement proposed by the director are consistent with customary use. If such agreement is held by the court in a final judgment to be invalid in whole or in part as inconsistent with customary use or as
 otherwise in conflict with Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code, the director shall promptly negotiate with the Secretary of Transportation, or his successor, a new agreement or agreements which shall conform to this chapter, as interpreted by the court in such action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Landscaped Freeways [5440. - 5443.5.]

5440.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this article, no advertising display may be placed or maintained on property adjacent to a 1,000-foot or greater section of a freeway that has been landscaped with at least an average width of 20 feet of landscaping or that includes trees,
 on department-owned property at the same or elevated grade of the main-traveled way if the advertising display is designed to be viewed primarily by persons traveling on the main-traveled way of the landscaped freeway.

(b) The department shall determine the average width by dividing the square footage of a landscaped area by its length.

(c) (1) All existing classifications shall remain in effect until the department receives a request for a new classification review in accordance with applicable regulations.

(2) The department may charge a fee in an amount not to exceed the reasonable costs incurred by the department in conducting a classification review and not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500).

(d) For purposes of this section, “average width of 20 feet” means that over any 1,000-foot section freeway there averages at least 20 feet of total property contiguous to all sides of the main traveled way between the outer edge of the shoulders and the freeway right-of-way boundaries, including median plantings, that otherwise meets the definition of a landscaped freeway in Section 5216.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 926, Sec. 2.   (AB 3168)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5440.1.

Except as provided in Section 5442.5, no advertising display may be placed or maintained along any highway or segment of any interstate highway or primary highway that before, on, or after the effective date of Section 131(s) of Title 23 of the United States Code is an officially designated scenic highway or scenic byway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 991, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5441.

Any advertising display which is now, or hereafter becomes, in violation of Section 5440 shall be subject to removal three years from the date the freeway has been declared a landscaped freeway by the director or the director’s designee and the character of the freeway has been changed from a freeway to a landscaped freeway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 653, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.

Section 5440 does not apply to any advertising structure or sign if the advertising display is used exclusively for any of the following purposes:

(a) To advertise the sale or lease of the property upon which the advertising display is placed.

(b) To designate the name of the owner or occupant of the premises upon which the advertising display is placed, or to identify the premises.

(c) To advertise goods manufactured or produced, or services rendered, on the property upon which the advertising display is placed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 991, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.5.

Section 5440.1 does not apply to any advertising display if the advertising display is used exclusively for any of the following purposes:

(a) Directional and official signs and notices, including, but not be limited to, signs and notices pertaining to natural wonders or scenic and historical attractions that are otherwise required or authorized by law and conform to regulations adopted by the department.

(b) Signs, displays, and devices advertising the sale or lease of real property upon which they are located.

(c) Signs, displays, and devices, including, but not limited to, those that may be changed at reasonable intervals by electronic process or by remote control, advertising activities conducted on the property on which they are located.

(d) Signs lawfully in existence on October 22, 1965, as determined by the department to be landmark signs, including signs on farm structures or natural surfaces, or of historic or artistic significance the preservation of which, in the opinion of the department, would be consistent with the purposes of this section, as determined by regulations adopted by the department.

(e) Signs, displays, and devices advertising the distribution by nonprofit organizations of free coffee to individuals traveling on the interstate system or the primary system. For the purpose of this subdivision, the term “free coffee” means, coffee for which a donation may be made, but is not required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 991, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.7.

(a) Section 5440 does not apply to any freestanding identifying structure that is used exclusively to identify development projects, business centers, or associations located within the jurisdiction of, and sponsored by, the City of Richmond to support economic development activities.

(b) A structure erected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall conform to all of the following conditions:

(1) Not more than one identifying structure may be used by the City of Richmond and only if approved by that city by ordinance or resolution after a duly noticed public hearing regarding the structure.

(2) Placement of the structure shall not require the immediate trimming, pruning, topping, or removal of existing trees to provide visibility to the structure, unless done as part of the normal landscape maintenance activities that would have been undertaken without regard to the placement of the structure.

(3) The structure shall be generic only and shall not identify any specific business.

(4) No public funds may be expended to pay for the costs of the structure.

(5) The structure shall not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 644, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.8.

Section 5440 does not apply to any advertising structure or sign if the advertising display is used exclusively to identify development projects, business centers, or associations located within the jurisdiction of, or sponsored by, the City of Costa Mesa to support economic development activities, if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) No other display is used by the city pursuant to this section.

(b) The governing body of the city has authorized placement of the display by an ordinance or resolution adopted following a duly noticed public hearing regarding the display.

(c) Placement of the display will not necessitate the immediate trimming, pruning, topping, or removal of existing trees in order to make the display visible or to improve its visibility, unless done as part of the normal landscape maintenance activities that would have been undertaken without regard to the placement of the display.

(d) The display does not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds, as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 117, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.9.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 5440, a city described in subdivision (b) may erect a nonconforming display if all of the following apply:

(1) The display is placed on property that the city has owned since before January 1, 1995.

(2) Not more than one additional display is added to the number of signs within the city that do not conform to this article as of January 1, 2000.

(3) The display is located within the boundaries of the city.

(4) Placement or maintenance of the display does not require the immediate trimming, pruning, topping, or removal of existing trees to provide visibility to the display, unless done as part of the normal landscape maintenance activities that would have been undertaken without regard to the placement or maintenance of the display.

(5) No public funds are required to be expended to pay for the costs of the display.

(6) The display does not impose additional liability on the Department of Transportation.

(7) The display does not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds, as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(8) All proceeds received by a participating city by allowing the erection of the nonconforming display are expended by the city solely for parks and programs for at-risk youth.

(9) The display does not advertise products or services which are directed at an adult population, including, but not limited to, alcohol, tobacco, and gambling activities.

(b) For purposes of this section, city is any city that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The city’s population is 17,000 persons or less.

(2) The city’s annual budget is less than eight million dollars ($8,000,000).

(3) The city’s geographical area is less than 1.7 square miles.

(4) The city is located in an urbanized county containing a population of 6,000,000 or more persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 280, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.10.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Section 5440 does not apply to any advertising display if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) Not more than five advertising displays, whose placement or maintenance is otherwise prohibited under this chapter, shall be erected and only if approved by the Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum Authority.

(2) All five advertising displays shall meet the 1,200 square foot size restriction set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 5408. However, subject to subdivision (b), three of the advertising displays may be vertically oriented so long as those displays do not exceed 60 feet in height and 25 feet in length, including border and trim and excluding base or apron supports, and other structural members.

(3) The display area of each advertising display is measured by the smallest square, rectangle, circle, or combination that will encompass the display area. For purposes of this section, embellishments and secondary signs located in the border or trim around a display area advertising the name of the coliseum complex or the identities of athletic teams who are licensees or lessees of all or portions of the Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum Complex shall not cause the border or trim areas to be included in a display face for measurement purposes. In the case of an LED display advertising on-premises activities at the Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum Complex, or off-premises, noncommercial community activities, the LED portion of the display face shall not be included for measurement purposes.

(4) Placement or maintenance of each advertising display does not require the immediate trimming, pruning, topping, or removal of trees located on a state highway right-of-way to provide visibility to the advertising display, unless done as part of the normal landscape maintenance activities that would have been undertaken without regard to the placement of the display.

(5) No advertising display shall advertise products or services that are directed at an adult population, including, but not limited to, alcohol, tobacco, gambling, or sexually explicit material.

(6) Each advertising display shall be located on the Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum Complex property and shall comply with the spacing requirements set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 5408, as implemented by department regulation.

(7) If any advertising display erected pursuant to this section is removed for purposes of a transportation project undertaken by the department, the display owner is entitled to relocate that display within the Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum Complex property, and is not entitled to monetary compensation for the removal or relocation even if relocation is not possible.

(8) The display shall not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(b) For the specific purpose of this section and in accordance with the Memorandum for Record with the Federal Highway Administration dated January 17, 2001, upon the written request of the Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum Authority on behalf of its licensee or contractor seeking to erect one or more of the three advertising displays allowed by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) consisting of a size not to exceed 60 feet in height and 25 feet in length, the department shall promptly request Federal Highway Administration approval of that change in orientation to ensure that the advertising displays will not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds. Upon receipt of the approval from the Federal Highway Administration, the advertising display or displays may be erected.

(c) For the purposes of this section, the Oakland-Alameda County Coliseum Complex is the real property and improvements located at 7000 Coliseum Way, City of Oakland, and more particularly described in Parcel Map 7000, filed August 1, 1996, Map Book 223, Page 84, Alameda County Records, Assessor’s Parcel Nos. 041-3901-008 and 041-3901-009.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 54, Sec. 2.   Effective July 11, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.11.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Section 5440 does not apply to any advertising display in the Mid-City Recovery Redevelopment Project Area within the City of Los Angeles if all of the following conditions are met:

(a) Not more than four advertising displays, whose placement or maintenance is otherwise prohibited under this chapter, may be erected if approved by the Community Redevelopment Agency of the City of Los Angeles as part of an owner-participation agreement or disposition and development agreement.

(b) All four advertising displays meet the requirements set forth in Section 5405 and 5408.

(c) Placement or maintenance of each advertising display does not require the immediate trimming, pruning, topping, or removal of trees located on a state highway right-of-way to provide visibility to the advertising display, unless done as part of the normal landscape maintenance activities that would have been undertaken without regard to the placement of the display.

(d) No advertising display shall advertise products or services that are directed at an adult population, including, but not limited to, alcohol, tobacco, gambling, or sexually explicit material.

(e) If any advertising display erected pursuant to this section is removed for purposes of a transportation project undertaken by the department, the display owner is entitled to relocate that display and is not entitled to monetary compensation for the removal or relocation.

(f) The advertising display shall not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5442.13.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, Section 5440 shall not prohibit an advertising display in the City of Los Angeles by a not-for-profit educational academy that is exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 501(c)(3) of Title 26 of the United States Code, if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The exception provided by this section is limited to only one advertising display.

(2) The site of the academy is located immediately adjacent to State Highway Routes 10 and 110 in the City of Los Angeles.

(3) The academy’s curriculum focuses on providing arts and entertainment business education.

(4) The advertising display is constructed on the roof of the academy’s facility.

(5) The advertising display meets the requirements set forth in Sections 5405 and 5408.

(6) Placement or maintenance of the advertising display does not require the immediate trimming, pruning, topping, or removal of trees located on a state highway right-of-way to provide visibility to the advertising display, unless done as part of the normal landscape maintenance activities that would have been undertaken without regard to the placement of the display.

(7) Revenues accruing to the academy from the advertising display are used exclusively for the acquisition, operation, and improvement of the academy.

(b) An advertising display erected pursuant to this section shall not advertise products or services that are directed at an adult population, including, but not limited to, alcohol, tobacco, gambling, or sexually explicit material.

(c) If an advertising display erected pursuant to this section is removed for purposes of a transportation project undertaken by the department, the display owner shall be entitled to relocate that advertising display with no compensation for the removal or relocation, and the relocation shall be limited to a site on the property of the academy specified in subdivision (a).

(d) An advertising display erected pursuant to this section shall not cause a reduction in federal aid highway funds, as provided in Section 131 of Title 23 of the United States Code.

(e) If the academy specified in subdivision (a) closes or otherwise ceases to operate, the advertising display permitted under this section shall no longer be authorized and shall be removed from the property of the academy.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 5412, if the property on which the academy specified in subdivision (a) is sold, the seller shall remove the billboard from the property without compensation before title to the property is transferred to the buyer.

(g) The academy specified in subdivision (a) shall prepare an audit of the revenues generated by the advertising display authorized under this section that includes, but is not limited to, the total revenues generated from the display, the amount of revenues received by the academy, and the expenditures and uses of the revenue. The audit shall be submitted to the Controller and the Legislature on or before January 1, 2007, and every four years thereafter.
